Nebraska, session 109, LB158.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB158 LB158
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cost-sharing requirement means any copayment, deductible, or
annual limitation on cost sharing, required by or on behalf of a health
benefit plan enrollee in order to receive a specific health care service,
including a prescription drug covered by a health plan, whether covered
under the medical or pharmacy benefit;
(b) Health benefit plan means a policy, contract, certificate, or
subscriber agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a health carrier
to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs
of health care services;
(c) Health carrier has the same meaning as in section 44-1303;
(d) Person means a natural person, corporation, mutual company,
unincorporated association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability
company, trust, estate, foundation, nonprofit corporation, unincorporated
organization, or government or governmental subdivision or agency; and
(e) Pharmacy benefit manager has the same meaning as in section
44-4603.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, for
any health benefit plan entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, a health carrier or pharmacy benefit manager shall
include any amount paid by a health benefit plan enrollee or paid on
behalf of an enrollee by another person for purposes of calculating the
enrollee's overall contribution to any out-of-pocket maximum or cost-
sharing requirement under a health benefit plan.
(b) If the requirement described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection would result in the ineligibility of a health savings account
under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, such requirement for such
health savings account shall only apply after the enrollee has satisfied
the minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code,
except that for items or services that are preventive care pursuant to
section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, such requirement shall
-2-

LB158 LB158
2025 2025
apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under section 223 of
the Internal Revenue Code has been satisfied.
-3-